Illinois, session 104th, SB2227.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Universal Basic Income Prohibition Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "State agency" means all boards, commissions, agencies, 8institutions, authorities, and bodies politic and corporate of 9the State, created by or in accordance with the constitution 10or statute, of the executive branch of State government. 11"State agency" includes colleges, universities, and 12institutions under the jurisdiction of the governing boards of 13the University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, 14Illinois State University, Eastern Illinois University, 15Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois University, 16Chicago State University, Governors State University, 17Northeastern Illinois University, and the Board of Higher 18Education. "State agency" does not include public employee 19retirement systems or investment boards that are subject to 20fiduciary duties imposed by the Illinois Pension Code or to 21the University of Illinois Foundation, units of local 22government, school districts, community colleges under the 23Public Community College Act, or the Illinois Comprehensive   SB2227- 2 -LRB104 05592 BDA 15622 b1Health Insurance Board. 2    "Universal basic income" means a government program that 3provides a base income to persons residing in Illinois by 4disbursing direct, recurring cash payments to persons to be 5used for any purpose without qualification or restriction. 6    Section 10. Prohibition on universal basic income 7programs. The General Assembly, a State agency, or a unit of 8local government may not pass a law, rule, resolution, or 9ordinance establishing a universal basic income program or any 10similar program. 11    Section 15. Exceptions. Nothing in this Act shall be 12construed to (i) diminish, negate, or interfere with a State 13public aid or social welfare program established by law, rule, 14resolution, or ordinance before the effective date of this Act 15that does not meet the criteria of a universal basic income 16program, including, but not limited to, township general 17assistance programs established under the Township Code, or 18(ii) prohibit the passage of a law, rule, resolution, or 19ordinance that establishes or implements a public aid or 20social welfare program that does not meet the criteria of a 21universal basic income program or any similar guaranteed 22income program. 23    Section 20. Home rule. The regulation of universal basic   SB2227- 3 -LRB104 05592 BDA 15622 b1income is an exclusive power and function of the State. A home 2rule unit may not regulate universal basic income. This Act is 3a denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions 4under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 5Illinois Constitution. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.